Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Article II Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Condominiums

34-36.1-2.01.
Creation of condominium.

A condominium may be created pursuant to this chapter only by recording a declaration in the municipal land evidence records. The declaration must be recorded in every municipality in which any portion of the condominium is located, and must be indexed in the grantee’s index in the name of the condominium and the association and in the grantor’s index in the name of each person executing the declaration.

A declaration or an amendment to a declaration adding units to a condominium, may not be recorded unless all structural components and mechanical systems of the building containing or comprising any units thereby created are substantially completed in accordance with the plans of that building, as evidenced by a certificate of completion executed by an independent registered engineer or architect which shall be recorded in the local land evidence records. No provision of this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting the recording of a declaration or amendment to a declaration which creates a condominium containing land only units or adds land only units to an existing condominium.

A declaration or an amendment to a declaration creating land only units shall set forth restrictions on the development of such land only units which address at a minimum the following items:

Floor area square footage,

Lot coverage,

Height,

Set backs from unit boundaries,

Use, and

Architectural and design standards.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 1991; ch. 369, § 2.

34-36.1-2.02.
Unit boundaries.

Except as provided by the declaration:

If walls, floors or ceilings are designated as boundaries of a unit, all lath, furring, wallboard, plasterboard, plaster, paneling, tiles, wallpaper, paint, finished flooring, and any other materials constituting any part of the finished surfaces thereof are a part of the unit, and all other portions of the walls, floors, or ceilings are a part of the common elements.

If any chute, flue, duct, wire, conduit, bearing wall, bearing column, or any other fixture lies partially within and partially outside the designated boundaries of a unit, any portion thereof serving only that unit is a limited common element allocated solely to that unit, and any portion thereof serving more than one unit or any portion of the common elements is a part of the common elements.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision (2), all spaces, interior partitions, and other fixtures and improvements within the boundaries of a unit are a part of the unit.

Any shutters, awnings, window boxes, doorsteps, stoops, porches, balconies, patios, and all exterior doors and windows or other fixtures designed to serve a single unit, but located outside the unit’s boundaries, are limited common elements allocated exclusively to that unit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-2.03.
Construction and validity of declaration and bylaws.

All provisions of the declaration and bylaws are severable, except a housing restriction as set forth in §

34-39.1-3

, may not be severed from the declaration and bylaws.

The rule against perpetuities may not be applied to defeat any provision of the declaration, bylaws, rules, or regulations adopted pursuant to §

34-36.1-3.02(a)(1)

.

In the event of a conflict between the provisions of the declaration and the bylaws, the declaration prevails except to the extent the declaration is inconsistent with this chapter.

Title to a unit and common elements is not rendered unmarketable or otherwise affected by reason of an insubstantial failure of the declaration to comply with this chapter. Whether a substantial failure impairs marketability is not affected by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 368, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 464, § 3.

34-36.1-2.04.
Description of units.

A description of a unit which sets forth the name of the condominium, the recording data for the declaration, the municipality, city or town, in which the condominium is located, and the identifying number of the unit, is a sufficient legal description of that unit and all rights, obligations, and interests appurtenant to that unit which were created by the declaration or bylaws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-2.05.
Contents of declaration.

The declaration for a condominium must contain:

The name of the condominium, which must include the word “condominium” or be followed by the words “a condominium,” and the association;

The name of every municipality in which any part of the condominium is situated;

A legally sufficient description of the real estate included in the condominium;

A statement of the maximum number of units which the declarant reserves the right to create;

A description of the boundaries of each unit created by the declaration, including the unit’s identifying number;

A description of any limited common elements, other than those specified in §

34-36.1-2.02(2)

and (4), or as provided in §

34-36.1-2.09(b)(10)

;

A description of any real estate (except real estate subject to development rights) which may be allocated subsequently as limited common elements, other than limited common elements specified in §

34-36.1-2.02(2)

and (4), together with a statement that they may be so allocated;

A description of any development rights and other special declarant rights (§

34-36.1-1.03(26)

) reserved by the declarant, together with a legally sufficient description of the real estate to which each of those rights applies, and a time limit within which each of those rights must be exercised;

If any development right may be exercised with respect to different parcels of real estate at different times, a statement to that effect together with:

Either a statement fixing the boundaries of those portions and regulating the order in which those portions may be subjected to the exercise of each development right, or a statement that no assurances are made in those regards, and

A statement as to whether, if any development right is exercised in any portion of the real estate subject to that development right, that development right must be exercised in all or in any other portion of the remainder of that real estate;

Any other conditions or limitations under which the rights described in subdivision (8) of this section may be exercised or will lapse;

An allocation to each unit of the allocated interests in the manner described in §

34-36.1-2.07

;

Any restrictions on use, occupancy, and alienation of the units, including any housing restrictions as set forth in §

34-39.1-3

;

The recording data for recorded easements and licenses appurtenant to or included in the condominium or to which any portion of the condominium is or may become subject by virtue of a reservation in the declaration; and

All matters required by §§

34-36.1-2.06

,

34-36.1-2.07

,

34-36.1-2.08

,

34-36.1-2.09

,

34-36.1-2.15

,

34-36.1-2.16

, and

34-36.1-3.03(d)

.

The declaration may contain any other matters the declarant deems appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 368, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 464, § 3.

34-36.1-2.06.
Leasehold condominiums.

Any lease the expiration or termination of which may terminate the condominium or reduce its size, or a memorandum thereof, shall be recorded. Every lessor of those leases must sign the declaration, and the declaration shall state:

The recording data for the lease (or a statement of where the complete lease may be inspected);

The date on which the lease is scheduled to expire;

A legally sufficient description of the real estate subject to the lease;

Any right of the unit owners to redeem the reversion and the manner whereby those rights may be exercised, or a statement that they do not have those rights;

Any right of the unit owners to remove any improvements within a reasonable time after the expiration or termination of the lease, or a statement that they do not have those rights;

Any rights of the unit owners to renew the lease and the conditions of any renewal, or a statement that they do not have those rights; and

Any housing restriction as set forth in §

34-39.1-3

, and the details thereof.

After the declaration for a leasehold condominium is recorded, neither the lessor nor his or her successor in interest may terminate the leasehold interest of a unit owner who makes timely payment of his or her share of the rent and otherwise complies with all covenants which, if violated, would entitle the lessor to terminate the lease. A unit owner’s leasehold interest is not affected by failure of any other person to pay rent or fulfill any other covenant.

Acquisition of the leasehold interest of any unit owner by the owner of the reversion or remainder does not merge the leasehold and fee simple interests unless the leasehold interests of all unit owners subject to that reversion or remainder are acquired.

If the expiration or termination of a lease decreases the number of units in a condominium, the allocated interests shall be reallocated in accordance with §

34-36-7(a)

as though those units had been taken by eminent domain. Reallocations shall be confirmed by an amendment to the declaration prepared, executed, and recorded by the association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 368, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 464, § 3.

34-36.1-2.07.
Allocation of common element interest, votes, and common expense liabilities.

The declaration shall allocate a fraction or percentage of undivided interests in the common elements and in the common expenses of the association, and a portion of the votes in the association, to each unit including land only units and state the formulas used to establish those allocations. Those allocations may not discriminate in favor of units owned by the declarant, but may discriminate in favor of units subject to a housing restriction as set forth in §

34-39.1-3

. Except as set forth in §

34-36.1-1.03(7)

, no minimum percentage interest in the common elements is otherwise required.

If units may be added to or withdrawn from the condominium, the declaration must state the formulas to be used to reallocate the allocated interests among all units included in the condominium after the addition or withdrawal.

The declaration may provide: (i) That different allocations of votes shall be made to the units on particular matters specified in the declaration; (ii) For cumulative voting only for the purpose of electing members of the executive board; and (iii) For the class voting on specified issues affecting the class if necessary to protect valid interests of the class. A declarant may not utilize cumulative or class voting for the purpose of evading any limitation imposed on declarants by this chapter, nor may units constitute a class because they are owned by a declarant.

Except for minor variations due to rounding, the sum of the undivided interests in the common elements and common expense liabilities allocated at any time to all the units must each equal one if stated as fractions or one hundred percent (100%) if stated as percentages. In the event of discrepancy between an allocated interest and the results derived from application of the pertinent formula, the allocated interest prevails.

The common elements are not subject to partition, and any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of an undivided interest in the common elements made without the unit to which that interest is allocated, is void.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, and except as provided in §

34-36.1-2.12

which provides for the relocation of boundaries between adjoining units, the owners of any two (2) or more units may apply for a reallocation of their respective allocated interests to the executive board; but their application shall not attempt to alter common element interests except as they relate to the proposed reallocation of unit interests. Unless the executive board determines within thirty (30) days, that the reallocations are unreasonable, the association shall prepare an amendment that identifies the units involved, states the reallocations, is executed by those unit owners, contains words of conveyance between them, and upon recordation, is indexed in the name of the grantor and the grantee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 369, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 368, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 464, § 3.

34-36.1-2.08.
Limited common elements.

Except for the limited common elements described in §

34-36.1-2.02(2)

and (4), the declaration shall specify to which unit or units each limited common element is allocated. That allocation may not be altered without the consent of the unit owners whose units are affected.

Except as the declaration otherwise provides, a limited common element may be reallocated by an amendment to the declaration executed by the unit owners between or among whose units the reallocation is made. The persons executing the amendment shall provide a copy thereof to the association, which shall record it. The amendment shall be recorded in the names of the parties and the condominium.

A common element not previously allocated as a limited common element may not be so allocated except pursuant to provisions in the declaration made in accordance with §

34-36.1-2.05(a)(7)

. The allocations shall be made by amendments to the declaration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-2.09.
Plats and plans.

Plats and plans are a part of the declaration. Separate plats and plans are not required by this chapter if all the information required by this section is contained in either a plat or plan. Each plat and plan must be clear and legible and contain a certification that the plat or plan contains all information required by this section.

Each plat must show:

The name and a boundary survey of the entire condominium;

The location and dimensions of all real estate not subject to development rights, or subject only to the development right to withdraw, and the location and dimensions of all existing improvements within that real estate;

A legally sufficient description of any real estate subject to development rights, labeled to identify the rights applicable to each parcel;

The extent of any encroachments by or upon any portion of the condominium;

To the extent feasible, a legally sufficient description of all easements serving or burdening any portion of the condominium;

The location and dimensions of any vertical unit boundaries not shown or projected on plans recorded pursuant to subsection (d) and that unit’s identifying number;

The location with reference to an established datum of any horizontal unit boundaries not shown or projected on plans recorded pursuant to subsection (d) and that unit’s identifying number;

A legally sufficient description of any real estate in which the unit owners will own only an estate for years, labeled as “leasehold real estate”;

The distance between noncontiguous parcels of real estate comprising the condominium;

The location and dimensions of limited common elements, including porches, balconies and patios, other than parking spaces and the other limited common elements described in §

34-36.1-2.02(2)

and (4);

In the case of real estate not subject to development rights, all other matters customarily shown on land surveys.

A plat may also show the intended location and dimensions of any contemplated improvement to be constructed anywhere within the condominium. Any contemplated improvement shown must be labeled either “MUST BE BUILT” or “NEED NOT BE BUILT”.

To the extent not shown or projected on the plats, plans of the units must show or project:

The location and dimensions of the vertical boundaries of each unit, and that unit’s identifying number, provided, that if two (2) or more units have the same vertical boundaries one plan may be used for such units if so designated;

Any horizontal unit boundaries, with reference to an established datum, and that unit’s identifying number; and

Any units in which the declarant has reserved the right to create additional units or common elements (§

34-36.1-2.10

), identified appropriately.

Unless the declaration provides otherwise, the horizontal boundaries of part of a unit located outside of a building have the same elevation as the horizontal boundaries of the inside part, and need not be depicted on the plats and plans.

Upon exercising any development right, the declarant shall record either new plats and plans necessary to conform to the requirements of subsections (a), (b), and (d), or new certifications of plats and plans previously recorded if those plats and plans otherwise conform to the requirements of those subsections.

Any certification of a plat or plan required by this section or §

34-36.1-2.01(b)

must be made by an independent registered surveyor, architect, or engineer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-2.10.
Exercise of development rights.

To exercise any development right reserved under §

34-36.1-2.05(a)(8)

, the declarant shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration (§

34-36.1-2.17

) and comply with §

34-36.1-2.09

. The declarant is the unit owner of any units thereby created. The amendment to the declaration must assign an identifying number to each new unit created; and, except in the case of subdivision or conversion of units described in subsection (c), reallocate the allocated interests among all units. The amendment must describe any common elements and any limited common elements thereby created and, in the case of limited common elements, designate the unit to which each is allocated to the extent required by §

34-36.1-2.08

.

Development rights may be reserved within any real estate added to the condominium if the amendment adding that real estate includes all matters required by §§

34-36.1-2.05

or

34-36.1-2.06

as the case may be, and the plats and plans include all matters required by §

34-36.1-2.09

. This provision does not extend the time limit on the exercise of development rights imposed by the declaration pursuant to §

34-36.1-2.05

(a)(8).

Whenever a declarant exercises a development right to subdivide or convert a unit previously created into additional units, common elements, or both:

If the declarant converts the unit entirely to common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of that unit among the other units as if that unit has been taken by eminent domain §

34-36.1-1.07

.

If the declarant subdivides the unit into two (2) or more units, whether or not any part of the unit is converted into common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of the unit among the units created by the subdivision in any reasonable manner prescribed by the declarant.

The time limit set forth in the declaration within which any development rights and other special declarant rights reserved by the declarant must be exercised pursuant to §

34-36.1-2.05 (a)(8)

may be extended by an affirmation of seventy-five percent (75%) of unit owners and their mortgagees (if any).

Development rights and other special declarant rights reserved by the declarant that expire unexercised shall become the property of the unit owners’ association which unit owners’ association shall have the power and right by vote or agreement of seventy-five percent (75%) of unit owners and their mortgagees (if any) to establish a new time limit within which each of such unexercised rights must be exercised by the unit owners’ association or its assignee.

If the declarant provides, pursuant to §

34-36.1-2.05(a)(8)

, that all or a portion of the real estate is subject to the development right of withdrawal:

If all the real estate is subject to withdrawal, and the declaration does not describe separate portions of real estate subject to that right, none of the real estate may be withdrawn after a unit has been conveyed to a purchaser; and

If a portion or portions are subject to withdrawal, no portion may be withdrawn after a unit in that portion has been conveyed to a purchaser.

Development rights and other special declarant rights reserved by the declarant that have expired unexercised and which have become the property of the association and which have already received a vote or agreement of seventy-five percent (75%) of unit owners and their mortgagees (if any) to establish a new time limit within which each of such unexercised rights must be exercised by the unit owners’ association or its assignee may be included upon any new plat plan or real estate added to the condominium as an amendment to the declaration as described in subsection (b) of this section. An amendment to the declaration pursuant to this section permitting real estate to be added to the condominium property shall require that the association receive a vote or agreement of fifty-one percent (51%) of unit owners.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 404, § 1.

Particular Cases.

Where plaintiff acquired a foreclosing mortgagee’s interest in a parcel that had been mortgaged by a condominium declarant, as plaintiff did not exercise the right under

R.I. Gen. Laws

§

34-36.1-2.18(i)

to exclude the parcel from the condominium until after the condominium declaration’s time limit within which to withdraw the parcel had expired, the parcel no longer was withdrawable and, pursuant to

R.I. Gen. Laws

§

34-36.1-2.10(c)(4)

, title to unexercised declarant rights passed to the condominium association as a matter of law. Alessi v. Bowen Court Condo., 44 A.3d 736,

2012 R.I. LEXIS 70

(R.I. 2012).

34-36.1-2.11.
Alterations of units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, a unit owner:

May make any improvements or alterations to his or her unit that do not impair the structural integrity or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portion of the condominium;

May not change the appearance of the common elements, or the exterior appearance of a unit or any other portion of the condominium, without permission of the association;

After acquiring an adjoining unit or an adjoining part of an adjoining unit, may remove or alter any intervening partition or create apertures therein, even if the partition in whole or in part is a common element, if those acts do not impair the structural integrity or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portion of the condominium. Removal of partitions or creation of apertures under this subdivision is not an alteration of boundaries.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-2.12.
Relocation of boundaries between adjoining units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, the boundaries between adjoining units may be relocated by an amendment to the declaration upon application to the association by the owners of those units. If the owners of the adjoining units have specified a reallocation between their units of their allocated interests, the application must state the proposed reallocations. Unless the executive board determines, within thirty (30) days, that the reallocations are unreasonable, the association shall prepare an amendment that identifies the units involved, states the reallocations, is executed by those unit owners, contains words of conveyance between them, and upon recordation, is indexed in the name of the grantor and the grantee.

The association shall prepare and record plats or plans necessary to show the altered boundaries between adjoining units, and their dimensions and identifying numbers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-2.13.
Subdivisions of units.

If the declaration expressly so permits, a unit may be subdivided into two (2) or more units. Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, upon application of a unit owner to subdivide a unit, the association shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration including the plats and plans, subdividing that unit.

The amendment to the declaration must be executed by the owner of the unit to be subdivided, assign an identifying number to each unit created, and reallocate the allocated interest formerly allocated to the subdivided unit to the new units in any reasonable manner prescribed by the owner of the subdivided unit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-2.14.
Easement for encroachments.

To the extent that any unit or common element encroaches on any other unit or common element, a valid easement for the encroachment exists. The easement does not relieve a unit owner of liability in case of his or her willful misconduct nor relieve a declarant or any other person of liability for failure to adhere to the plats and plans.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-2.15.
Use for sales purposes.

A declarant may maintain sales offices, management offices, and models in units or on common elements in the condominium only if the declaration so provides and specifies the rights of a declarant with regard to the number, size, location, and relocation thereof. Any sales office, management office, or model not designated a unit by the declaration is a common element, and if a declarant ceases to be a unit owner, he or she ceases to have any rights with regard thereto unless it is removed promptly from the condominium in accordance with a right to remove reserved in the declaration. Subject to any limitations in the declaration, a declarant may maintain signs on the common elements advertising the condominium. The provisions of this section are subject to the provisions of other state law, and to local ordinances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-2.16.
Easement rights.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration, a declarant has an easement through the common elements as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of discharging a declarant’s obligations or exercising special declarant rights, whether arising under this chapter or reserved in the declaration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-2.17.
Amendment of declaration.

Except in cases of amendments that may be executed by a declarant under §

34-36.1-2.09(f)

or

34-36.1-2.10

; the association under §

34-36.1-1.07

,

34-36.1-2.06(d)

,

34-36.1-2.07(f)

,

34-36.1-2.08(c)

,

34-36.1-2.12(a)

, or

34-36.1-2.13

; or certain unit owners under §

34-36.1-2.07(f)

,

34-36.1-2.08(b)

,

34-36.1-2.12

,

34-36.1-2.13(b)

, or

34-36.1-2.18(b)

, and except as limited by subsection (d) of this section, the declaration, including the plats and plans, may be amended only by vote or agreement of unit owners of units to which at least sixty-seven percent (67%) of the votes in the association are allocated, or any larger majority the declaration specifies. The declaration may specify a smaller number only if all the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use.

No action to challenge the validity of an amendment adopted by the association pursuant to this section may be brought more than one year after the amendment is recorded.

Every amendment to the declaration must be recorded in every municipality in which any portion of the condominium is located, and is effective only upon recordation. An amendment shall be indexed in the grantee’s index in the name of the condominium and the association and in the grantor’s index in the name of the parties executing the amendment.

Except to the extent expressly permitted or required by other provisions of this chapter, no amendment may create or increase special declarant rights, increase the number of units, change the boundaries of any unit, the allocated interests of a unit, or the uses to which any unit is restricted, in the absence of unanimous consent of the unit owners.

Amendments to the declaration required by this chapter to be recorded by the association shall be prepared, executed, recorded, and certified on behalf of the association by any officer of the association designated for that purpose or, in the absence of designation, by the president of the association.

A declaration and bylaws may require that amendments to any sections dealing with housing restrictions as set forth in §

34-39.1-3

, may also require notice to and/or consent of the restriction holder before such amendments shall take effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 368, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 464, § 3.

34-36.1-2.18.
Termination of a condominium.

Except in the case of a taking of all the units by eminent domain §

34-36.1-1.07

, a condominium may be terminated only by agreement of unit owners of units to which at least eighty percent (80%) of the votes in the association are allocated, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units in the condominium are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses.

An agreement to terminate must be evidenced by the execution of a termination agreement, or ratifications thereof, in the same manner as a deed, by the requisite number of unit owners. The termination agreement must specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless it is recorded before that date. A termination agreement and all ratifications thereof must be recorded in every municipality in which a portion of the condominium is situated, and is effective only upon recordation.

In the case of a condominium containing only units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide that all the common elements and units of the condominium shall be sold following termination. If, pursuant to the agreement, any real estate in the condominium is to be sold following termination, the termination agreement must set forth the minimum terms of the sale.

In the case of a condominium containing any units not having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide for sale of the common elements, but may not require that the units be sold following termination, unless the declaration as originally recorded provided otherwise or unless all the unit owners consent to the sale.

The association, on behalf of the unit owners, may contract for the sale of real estate in the condominium, but the contract is not binding on the unit owners until approved pursuant to subsections (a) and (b). If any real estate in the condominium is to be sold following termination, title to that real estate, upon termination, vests in the association as trustee for the holders of all interests in the units. Thereafter, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the sale. Until the sale has been concluded and the proceeds thereof distributed, the association continues in existence with all powers it had before termination. Proceeds of the sale must be distributed to unit owners and lien holders as their interests may appear, in proportion to the respective interests of unit owners as provided in subsection (h). Unless otherwise specified in the termination agreement, as long as the association holds title to the real estate, each unit owner and his or her successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted his or her unit. During the period of that occupancy, each unit owner and his or her successors in interest remain liable for all assessments and other obligations imposed on unit owners by this chapter or the declaration.

If the real estate constituting the condominium is not to be sold following termination, title to the common elements and, in a condominium containing only units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, title to all the real estate in the condominium, vests in the unit owners upon termination as tenants in common in proportion to their respective interests as provided in subsection (h), and liens on the units shift accordingly. While the tenancy in common exists, each unit owner and his or her successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted his or her unit.

Following termination of the condominium, the proceeds of any sale of real estate, together with the assets of the association, are held by the association as trustee for unit owners and holders of liens on the units as their interests may appear. Following termination, creditors of the association holding liens on the units, which were recorded prior to termination, may enforce those liens in the same manner as any lien holder. All other creditors of the association shall be treated as if they had perfected liens on the units immediately prior to termination.

The respective interests of unit owners referred to in subsections (e), (f), and (g) are as follows:

Except as provided in subdivision (h)(2), the respective interests of unit owners are the fair market values of their units, limited common elements, and common elements interests immediately before the termination, as determined by one or more independent appraisers selected by the association. The decision of the independent appraisers shall be distributed to the unit owners and becomes final unless disapproved within thirty (30) days after distribution by unit owners of units to which a majority of the votes in the association are allocated. The proportion of any unit owner’s interest to that of all unit owners is determined by dividing the fair market value of that unit owner’s unit and common element interest by the total fair market values of all the units and common elements.

If any unit or any limited common element is destroyed to the extent that an appraisal of the fair market value thereof prior to destruction cannot be made, the interests of all unit owners are their respective common element interests immediately before the termination.

Except as provided in subsection (j), foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against the entire condominium does not of itself terminate the condominium, and foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the condominium, other than withdrawable real estate, does not withdraw that portion from the condominium. Foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against withdrawable real estate does not of itself withdraw that real estate from the condominium, but the person taking title thereto has the right to require from the association, upon request, an amendment excluding the real estate from the condominium.

If a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the real estate comprising the condominium has priority over the declaration, and the lien or encumbrance has not been partially released, the parties foreclosing the lien or encumbrance may upon foreclosure, record an instrument excluding the real estate subject to that lien or encumbrance from the condominium.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-2.19.
Rights of secured lenders.

The declaration may require that all or a specified number or percentage of the mortgagees or beneficiaries of deeds of trust encumbering the units approve specified actions of the unit owners or the association as a condition to the effectiveness of those actions, but no requirement for approval may operate to:

Deny or delegate control over the general administrative affairs of the association by the unit owners or the executive board, or

Prevent the association or the executive board from commencing, intervening in, or settling any litigation or proceedings, or receiving and distributing any insurance proceeds except pursuant to §

34-36.1-3.13

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-2.20.
Master associations.

If the declaration for a condominium provides that any of the powers described in §

34-36.1-3.02

are to be exercised by or may be delegated to a profit or nonprofit corporation or unincorporated association which exercises those or other powers on behalf of one or more condominiums or for the benefit of the unit owners of one or more condominiums, all provisions of this chapter applicable to unit owners’ associations apply to the corporation or unincorporated association, except as modified by this section.

Unless a master association is acting in the capacity of an association described in §

34-36.1-3.01

, it may exercise the powers set forth in §

34-36.1-3.02(a)(2)

only to the extent expressly permitted in the declarations of condominiums which are part of the master association or expressly described in the delegations of power from those condominiums to the master association.

If the declaration of any condominium provides that the executive board may delegate certain powers to a master association, the members of the executive board have no liability for the acts or omissions of the master association with respect to those powers following delegation.

The rights and responsibilities of unit owners with respect to the unit owners’ association set forth in §§

34-36.1-3.03

,

34-36.1-3.08

—

34-36.1-3.10

, and

34-36.1-3.12

apply in the conduct of the affairs of a master association only to those persons who elect the board of a master association, whether or not those persons are otherwise unit owners within the meaning of this chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

34-36.1-3.03(f)

with respect to the election of the executive board of an association, by all unit owners after the period of declarant control ends, and even if a master association is also an association described in §

34-36.1-3.01

, the certificate of incorporation or other instrument creating the master association and the declaration of each condominium the powers of which are assigned by the declaration or delegated to the master association, may provide that the executive board of the master association must be elected after the period of declarant control in any of the following ways:

All unit owners of all condominiums subject to the master association may elect all members of that executive board.

All members of the executive boards of all condominiums subject to the master association may elect all members of that executive board.

All unit owners of each condominium subject to the master association may elect specified members of that executive board.

All members of the executive board of each condominium subject to the master association may elect specified members of that executive board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.